Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 4 State Parks and Cultural Resources

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 158, § 1, provides: “(a) There is appropriated six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, these funds which are unexpended, unobligated or unencumbered as of June 30, 2010 shall not revert to the general fund but shall be retained by the department for the purposes specified in this subsection. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request. This appropriation shall only be expended for the following purposes and notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose:

“(i) Three hundred thirty-one thousand dollars ($331,000.00) for capital construction at Fort Fred Steele historic site for building restoration and stabilization, a facility host site and interpretive trails;

“(ii) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for capital construction at the Piedmont charcoal kilns for stone restoration work, upgrading the path system and providing access for those with disabilities;

“(iii) Two hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($219,000.00) for improvements at the Carissa mine site.

“(b) There is appropriated three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, these funds which are unexpended, unobligated or unencumbered as of June 30, 2010 shall not revert to the general fund but shall be retained by the department for the purposes specified in this subsection. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request. This appropriation shall only be expended for improvements in the interpretation at the department's historical and archeological sites.”

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming Yellowstone park commission, see §

36-8-201

et seq.

As to Curt Gowdy state park, see §§

36-8-601

and

36-8-602

.

As to Sinks Canyon state park, see §§

36-8-701

and

36-8-702

.

As to Fort Fred Steele state park, see §

36-8-801

.

As to Grand Teton national park, see §

36-10-201

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Conservation Easements: A Viable Tool for Land Preservation,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1997).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State's liability for personal injuries from criminal attack in state park, 59 ALR4th 1236.

§ 36-4-101.
Commission established; composition; appointment and terms of members; removal; representation from appointment districts; vacancies; meetings; president.

There is established the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission within the department of state parks and cultural resources which shall consist of nine (9) members, citizens of Wyoming. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be from the same political party. Commission members shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the state senate, and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Appointments made between sessions of the legislature shall be made in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. In addition, the governor is an ex officio member of the commission.

The term for commission members is five (5) years, and shall expire on March 1, providing that the terms of the members first appointed shall be staggered as follows:

Three (3) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years;

Three (3) members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years; and

Three (3) members shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years.

Each appointment district pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

shall at all times be represented by at least one (1) commissioner who is a resident of that district.

All vacancies occurring on the commission shall be filled by the governor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

.

The first meeting of the commission shall be at the call of the governor. Thereafter, the commission shall meet at least once every three (3) months. Other meetings may be held at the call of the president of the commission, the governor or a majority of the commission members.

At the first meeting of the commission and thereafter at the regular September meeting of each year, the commission shall elect one (1) of its members president who shall hold his office for a term of one (1) year. If a vacancy occurs in the office of president, the commission shall elect a member of the commission to serve as president for the remainder of that term.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

Any statute or legal or other document which refers to the Wyoming recreation commission established under subsection (a) of this section, as existing on and after April 1, 1990 and serving in an advisory capacity to the department of state parks and cultural resources, means the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission which is the successor to the recreation commission, as existing on and after April 1, 1990.

As used in W.S.

36-4-101

through

36-4-119

, “this act” means W.S.

36-4-101

through

36-4-119

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.1; Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 55, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2004, ch. 125, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendment

added (j).

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, near the beginning of (a), substituted “Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be from the same political party” for “not more than five (5) of whom shall be registered in the same political party” and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall be applicable to any lands sought to be acquired or designated as a state park, state public recreation area, state historical park, state historical site, state archeological site, state geological site or state ecological site on or after April 1, 2004.”

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 36-4-102.
Advisory board.

There is established an advisory board consisting of one (1) member from each county to be appointed by the governor and to serve for a term of two (2) years. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The president of the commission shall serve as the chairman of the advisory board. The advisory board shall meet at the call of the president of the commission or the governor.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.2; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 36-4-103.
What constitutes outdoor recreation areas and facilities.

For the purposes of this act, outdoor recreation areas and facilities shall include state parks, public recreation grounds, historical parks, and historical, archaeological, geological and ecological sites now in existence or hereafter created. As used in this section, W.S.

36-4-105

and

36-4-108

, “historical parks” includes all land and structures at South Pass City and Fort Fred Steele.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.3; Laws 1987, ch. 20, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

§ 36-4-104.
Powers; interpretive service agreements.

The department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission, may, subject to the provisions of this act:

Acquire and accept title in the name of the state of Wyoming, by grant, dedication, gift, devise, donation, or demise, to any lands suitable as an outdoor recreation area or facility;

With the concurrence of the board of land commissioners, set aside and designate as an outdoor recreation area or facility any suitable tract of land belonging to the state of Wyoming which is not appropriated to some other fund or use;

Take options to purchase lands subject to the approval and appropriation therefor of the next succeeding legislature;

Accept any gifts or grants for archives, museums and historical purposes;

Deaccession artifacts from the state’s collection;

Enter into agreements with Wyoming financial institutions, financial institutions or persons operating remote electronic terminals for the collection of donations for the operation and maintenance of Wyoming state parks, historic sites and recreation areas. Donations received by the department pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in an operations and maintenance account and upon legislative appropriation shall be expended by the department for the daily operation of outdoor locations and facilities as described in W.S.

36-4-103

.

To provide interpretive and educational services at recreation areas and facilities, the department may enter into agreements with private, nonprofit scientific, historic or educational organizations organized solely for the purpose of providing interpretive and educational services at Wyoming recreation areas and facilities. The department may under any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection, provide personnel services to assist any private, nonprofit organization with carrying out its interpretive and educational program and may provide space at or within any recreation area or facility for interpretive materials provided by the organization. Any organization entering into an agreement may:

Offer interpretive or educational materials for sale at recreation areas and facilities. Revenues collected from sales under this paragraph shall be retained by the organization solely for use in providing interpretive or educational services at the area or facility for which the organization provides these services;

Acquire display materials and equipment for exhibit at areas and facilities;

Support special area or facility interpretive or educational programs, other interpretive projects related to a specific area or facility and may support area or facility resource centers.

The department, with the advice of the commission, shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement subsection (b) of this section. Rules and regulations adopted under this subsection shall specify:

Procedures for entering into agreements for interpretive and educational services;

Guidelines for approving interpretive materials which present both sides of an issue, if appropriate, in a balanced manner to be provided by the contracting organization at recreation areas and facilities; and

Procedures for renewal and dissolution of agreements between the department and private, nonprofit organizations.

As used in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, “recreation areas and facilities” include both indoor and outdoor facilities at state parks, historic sites, recreation areas and historical, archaeological, geological and ecological sites as enumerated under W.S.

36-4-103

.

The department, with the advice of the commission, shall adopt procedures in accordance with this act for the acquisition or designation of any lands to be used as an outdoor recreation area or facility.

The department, in consultation with the commission, may recommend that any outdoor recreation area and facility be no longer designated as such or may recommend that it be disposed of through sale, exchange, lease or assignment of fee ownership. The recommendation for removal of the designation or disposal shall follow application of the criteria and procedures for accessioning areas or facilities under W.S. 36-4-106(e), (f) and (g).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.4; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 55, § 1; 1994, ch. 37, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2004, ch. 125, § 1; 2010, ch. 10, § 1; 2014 ch. 9, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), added “subject to the provisions of this act” at the end; and added (e) and (f).

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (f).

The 2014 amendment

added (a)(vi).

Laws 2014, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2014.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 3, provides: “There is a one-time appropriation from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000.00) for contract services and other administrative expenses under this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall be applicable to any lands sought to be acquired or designated as a state park, state public recreation area, state historical park, state historical site, state archeological site, state geological site or state ecological site on or after April 1, 2004.”

§ 36-4-105.
Naming of sites and parks.

Each state park, public recreation ground, historic park or archaeological, geological or ecological site created and established under this act shall be given an appropriate name by the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.5; Laws 1987, ch. 20, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

§ 36-4-106.
Plan for acquisition and development of resources; authority of department; coordination of activities; exceptions; agreements with United States; state archaeologist.

The department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission, shall prepare, maintain and keep up to date a comprehensive plan for the acquisition and development of outdoor recreation resources of the state. The department and the commission shall prepare the comprehensive plan in accordance with subsections (e) and (f) of this section. Authority is hereby granted to the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission, to develop, operate and maintain outdoor recreation areas and facilities of the state and to acquire pursuant to provisions of law, but not by the power of eminent domain, land, waters and interest in land and waters for such areas and facilities. Authority is hereby granted to the department, in consultation with the commission, to enter into contracts and agreements with the United States, or any appropriate agency thereof, to keep financial and other records relating thereto, and to furnish to appropriate officials and agencies of the United States such reports and information as may be reasonably necessary to enable such officials or agencies to perform their duties under the provisions of Public Law 88-578 or any other applicable federal statutes.

In connection with obtaining the benefits of any such program for the state of Wyoming, the department shall coordinate its activities with and fairly represent the interests of all agencies of the state, county, city and any other governmental units having interests in the planning, acquisition, development or maintenance of outdoor recreation resources and facilities within the state.

The department, in consultation with the commission, may enter into and administer agreements with the United States or any appropriate agency thereof for planning, acquisition and development of projects involving participation under federal aid funds on behalf of any county, city or other governmental unit; provided that such county, city or other local government unit gives necessary assurance to the department that it has available sufficient funds to meet its share of the cost of the project and that the acquired and developed areas will be operated and maintained at its expense for public outdoor recreation use.

There shall be appointed within the department of state parks and cultural resources a state archaeologist, who shall be a member of the department of anthropology of the University of Wyoming. The state archaeologist shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the Wyoming human resources division, which shall be in addition to any compensation received from the university. The state archaeologist may:

Investigate, study, preserve and record such evidence of prehistoric and early historic human activity as shall be reported from time to time by citizens of the state or of which the survey may otherwise become aware;

Begin and carry out as time permits an archaeological survey of the state, locating and recording all evidences of prehistoric and early historic human activity that may be encountered and maintaining records in the form of filed maps and documents deposited permanently at the University of Wyoming;

Engage in systematic, intensive archaeological investigations of significance to the reconstruction of the prehistory and early history of the state as time and facilities permit and to solicit funds for this work from the various public and private foundations and other sources generally available to the field archaeologist;

Prepare and publish from time to time technical reports bearing on the investigations carried out or of significance to the reconstruction of the prehistory and early history of the state;

Cooperate to the extent of capacity with communities and other agencies in the state interested in the establishment of local archaeological museums and related activities;

Cooperate with all agencies to the extent of capacity in the protection from vandalism, natural and other kinds of destruction of all objects of archaeological significance, to investigate, exhume and consult regarding archaeological human burials pursuant to W.S.

7-4-106

and to render aid in the enforcement of the Wyoming Antiquities Act;

Distribute all publications of the survey to the public on request, either free or at a price to be determined.

The department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission shall develop and maintain a comprehensive plan for the acquisition, disposal and development of outdoor recreation resources of the state. Criteria for evaluating resources for acquisition, disposal and development as an outdoor recreation area or facility under the plan shall be adopted as rules in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, prior to acquiring or accepting title to any lands for an outdoor recreation area or facility or designating or removing a designation of lands as an outdoor recreation area or facility, or disposing of any property as provided in W.S. 36-4-104(f), the department shall apply the site criteria process developed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. The department shall consult with the commission regarding the application of the site criteria and may inform the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee regarding the potential acquisition, designation, disposal or removal of designation. The department shall determine if the site should be acquired or disposed of or the lands so designated or removed from designation. After consultation with the commission, if the department determines the site should be acquired or disposed of or so designated or removed from designation, it shall make the recommendation to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee. The committee shall prepare legislation for the acquisition, disposal, removal from designation or designation of lands as an outdoor recreation area or facility as it determines appropriate and necessary.

The department may dispose of, designate or remove from designation any lands for an outdoor recreation area or facility without complying with the provisions of subsection (e) or (f) of this section if:

The disposal, designation or removal of designation is de minimus in nature as provided in department rule and regulation. “De minimus”, as used in this paragraph, means the property in question is less than five (5) acres in size;

The action conforms to either the department’s mission or the current strategic plan of the department;

The action conforms to the provisions of the department’s current master plan for the park or site where the property is located; and

The action is presented to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee for informational purposes prior to completion of the action.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.6; Laws 1969, ch. 168, § 15; 1973, ch. 162, § 1; 1989, ch. 140, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2004, ch. 125, § 1; 2010, ch. 10, § 1; 2019 ch. 59, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Antiquities Act, see §§

36-1-114

through

36-1-116

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), inserted the second sentence and inserted “to” preceding “enter into contracts and agreements” in the fourth sentence; and added (e) and (f).

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “disposal” twice in (e); in (f) inserted “Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section” and inserted variants of “disposal or removal of designation” throughout; and added (g).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d)(vi), substituted “archaeological significance, to investigate, exhume and consult regarding archaeological human burials pursuant to W.S.

7-4-106

” for “archaeological significance.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Federal act. —

Public Law 88-578, referred to in the last sentence in subsection (a), appears as
16 U.S.C. §
460

l

-4
et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 3, provides: “There is a one-time appropriation from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000.00) for contract services and other administrative expenses under this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall be applicable to any lands sought to be acquired or designated as a state park, state public recreation area, state historical park, state historical site, state archeological site, state geological site or state ecological site on or after April 1, 2004.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Conservation Easements: A Viable Tool for Land Preservation,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1997).

§ 36-4-107.
Authority to lease; exchange of lands and contracts with United States.

The department, in consultation with the commission, shall have the power and is hereby authorized to lease, grant or operate any outdoor recreation area or facility belonging to the state which is not subject to lease, grant or operation by another agency of the state. The department, in consultation with the commission, may exchange state lands which are not appropriated to other use for United States outdoor recreation areas and facilities, and under contract with the United States, may take over the management, leasing and operation of any such area or facility. Where the department deems it to be in the best interest of the state, it may, in consultation with the commission, contract with the United States government or any authorized federal agency for the operation of any outdoor recreation area or facility established by the department.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.7; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to exchange of state-owned and federal-owned lands, see §

36-1-106

.

§ 36-4-108.
Acquisition and supervision of historical parks and sites.

The department, in consultation with the commission, may receive or acquire, but not by use of the power of eminent domain, historical parks and sites within the state. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the department to receive, acquire and to maintain, but not by use of the power of eminent domain, land for other outdoor recreation areas and facilities. The department shall be subject to the provisions of W.S. 36-4-106(e) and (f) when acting pursuant to this section.

The department shall:

Supervise, maintain and control historic parks, including furnishing and controlling employees and equipment, possessing and controlling all items, objects and furnishings, and erecting all signs and markers;

Interpret historic parks and prepare and arrange all items, objects, furnishings and information;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Administer the state trails program; and

Erect, maintain and remove monuments and markers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.8; Laws 1987, ch. 20, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 55, § 1; 2004, ch. 125, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), added the last sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 3, provides: “There is a one-time appropriation from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000.00) for contract services and other administrative expenses under this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall be applicable to any lands sought to be acquired or designated as a state park, state public recreation area, state historical park, state historical site, state archeological site, state geological site or state ecological site on or after April 1, 2004.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks, 18 ALR4th 990.

Application and construction of § 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 USC § 470f), dealing with federally sponsored projects which affect historic properties, 68 ALR Fed 578.

§ 36-4-109.
Contracts and agreements with United States for improvements and maintenance.

The department, in consultation with the commission, is authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with the United States or any duly authorized representative or agency thereof to cause state outdoor recreation areas and facilities to be improved and maintained and for that purpose may contract to secure the labor of members of organizations under the control of the federal government or some duly authorized representative or agency thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.9; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

§ 36-4-110.
Power to lease or rent concessions.

The department, in consultation with the commission, is empowered to lease, enter into contracts and assess fees for concessions, cabin sites, boat clubs, and other services of all lawful kinds and nature on state outdoor recreation areas or facilities to persons, partnerships, and corporations for a valuable consideration upon terms and conditions as the department deems fit and proper. Funds received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited and expended in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(h).

The department, with the advice of the commission, shall promulgate rules that shall apply to any for profit business concession with a five (5) year or greater contract or lease term to promote the uniform and effective administration of state outdoor recreation areas and facilities. Rules adopted under this subsection shall specify:

Uniform procedures for bidding, entering into leases or contracts and assessing fees under this section, consistent with W.S. 9-2-3204(b)(iv), and making any forms available in electronic format on the department website;

Uniform guidelines for bonding and other obligations of service providers;

Uniform contract and lease guidelines, including ranges within which to negotiate contract or lease terms including the duration of contracts and leases; and

Any additional and prudent site-specific conditions and requirements.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.10; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 2005, ch. 97, § 1; 2019 ch. 66, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

rewrote this section to provide for deposit of funds for leases and concessions, cabin sites, boat clubs, and other services at state parks and historical and other sites.

Laws 2005, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), substituted “upon terms and conditions” for “upon such terms and conditions”; and added (b).

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204(b)(iv)" for "9-2-1016(b)(iv)" in (b)(i).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 66, § 3, provides: “(a) This act and the rules required under this act shall apply to all new, renewed or renegotiated contracts or leases with for profit business concessions that have a five (5) year or greater contract or lease term provided that:

“(i) Any existing contract or lease shall expire when its current term ends without renewal and any new or replacement contract or lease shall comply with this act and any rules required under this act;

“(ii) For any existing contract or lease that expires between the effective date of this section and January 1, 2020, no new or replacement contract or lease shall be executed except that an interim contract or lease may be managed on a month to month basis subject to paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

“(iii) Any expired contract or lease that is being managed on a month to month basis shall terminate on or before January 1, 2020 and any new or replacement contract or lease shall comply with this act and any rules required under this act.”

§ 36-4-111.
Authority to receive and expend monies; investments.

The state treasurer, after consultation with the governor, is hereby authorized and directed to receive and credit to the appropriate account any grant, donation, or bequest which is made to the state of Wyoming or the department which contains a condition or restriction that the income only therefrom shall be expended for the purposes provided by this act.

The department, in consultation with the commission, shall have the authority to receive in trust, any money or property of any kind or character, donated, granted, or bequeathed to the commission, the department or the state of Wyoming for outdoor recreation areas and facilities and to carry out the terms, if any, of any such grant, donation or bequest, or in the absence of any terms or limitations, to expend the money or the proceeds of any such property as it may deem advisable for outdoor recreation areas or facilities under the provisions of this act. The department shall be subject to the provisions of W.S. 36-4-106(e) and (f) when accepting property pursuant to this section to be designated as an outdoor recreation area or facility.

Money received and the proceeds or other property likewise received and disposed of by the department, in consultation with the commission, may be expended by the department for the purposes of this act.

Any money under this section shall be invested by the state treasurer in securities of any of the classes in which he is permitted by law to invest the general school funds of this state, and the interest received thereon shall be placed at the disposal of the department to be used by it in carrying out the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 189, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.11; Laws 1974, ch. 16, §§ 2, 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 2004, ch. 125, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), added the last sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “appropriate account” for “trust and agency fund” in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 3, provides: “There is a one-time appropriation from the budget reserve account to the department of state parks and cultural resources sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000.00) for contract services and other administrative expenses under this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 125, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall be applicable to any lands sought to be acquired or designated as a state park, state public recreation area, state historical park, state historical site, state archeological site, state geological site or state ecological site on or after April 1, 2004.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 36-4-112.
Receipt and expenditure of federal funds; use of funds from land and water conservation fund.

Authority is hereby granted for the state of Wyoming and its authorized representatives, with the approval of the governor, to receive and to disburse federal monies which may now and hereafter be available under the provisions of Public Law 88-578 [16 U.S.C. § 460

l

-4 et seq.] or any other applicable federal statutes, for the acquisition, development, operation and maintenance of outdoor recreation areas and facilities of the state. All funds received because of state participation in the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act shall accrue to the state treasurer who shall deposit them in the appropriate accounts. No funds so received shall be used for any purpose other than the administration of the provisions of the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act. Such projects may be undertaken by the department in consultation with the commission only after it has been determined that sufficient funds are available for meeting the state’s share of project costs.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.12; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 55, § 1.

Land and Water Conservation Fund Act. —

The federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act (Public Law 88-578), referred to in the first three sentences, appears as
16 U.S.C. §
460

l

-4
et seq.

§ 36-4-113.
Private improvement permits.

The department of state parks and cultural resources may grant permits to any individual, improvement club or voluntary association, or committee representing such clubs and associations, to improve, without expense to the state, any outdoor recreation area or facility established under the provisions of this act. All such improvements, changes, alterations or restorations shall be outlined in writing or set forth in drawings and specifications furnished by the department and the work undertaken shall be subject to inspection and supervision by the department during the course thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.13; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

§ 36-4-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 14, related to the organization and compensation of the Wyoming recreation commission.

§ 36-4-115.
Rules and regulations; general penalty for violations.

The department of state parks and cultural resources in consultation with the commission shall promulgate and enforce all reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out this act.

Rules and regulations promulgated by the department under this act and governing state parks and historic sites shall include the:

Conservation of peace and good order within each park;

Preservation of state property;

Promotion of the well-being of park visitors and residents; and

Definition of a public nuisance within state parks and historic sites.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall enforce its rules and regulations.

Any person violating this act or any rule and regulation promulgated by the department under subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.15; Laws 1989, ch. 8, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

§ 36-4-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to administration of Hot Springs state park, see §

36-4-122

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 16, provided an exemption from these provisions for Hot Springs state park.